Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-257
School board or board of education; emergency disciplinary actions; authorized.

The school board or board of education may authorize the emergency exclusion, short-term or long-term suspension, expulsion, or mandatory reassignment of any pupil from school for conduct prohibited by the board's rules or standards established pursuant to the Student Discipline Act if such emergency exclusion, short-term or long-term suspension, expulsion, or mandatory reassignment complies with the procedures required by the act.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,171;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 61.